Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Boarding and Lodging Homes

199.380.
Boarding and lodging homes for children under age sixteen — Authority to operate — Investigation — Revocation of authority. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 13, § 1; 1970, ch. 92, § 62; 1980, ch. 188, § 152, effective July 15, 1980; repealed by 2018 ch. 112, § 19, effective July 14, 2018.

199.390.
Record book of boarding or lodging home. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 13, § 2; 1970, ch. 92, § 63; 1980, ch. 188, § 153, effective July 15, 1980; repealed by 2018 ch. 112, § 19, effective July 14, 2018.

199.400.
Security for care and custody of nonresident child accepted for boarding or lodging in this state. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 13, § 3; 1970, ch. 92, § 64; repealed by 2018 ch. 112, § 19, effective July 14, 2018.

199.410.
Exceptions from KRS 199.380 to 199.400 — Application only to counties containing city with population of 20,000 or more. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 13, §§ 4, 6; 1950, ch. 125, § 8; 1952, ch. 83, § 7; 2014, ch. 92, § 268, effective January 1, 2015; repealed by 2018 ch. 112, § 19, effective July 14, 2018.